Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
[OLD] GENERAL REGULATIONS

§§134-1 to 18 [OLD] REPEALED. L 1988,
c 275, §4.

PART I.
GENERAL REGULATIONS

§134-1 Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise:

"Acquire" means gain ownership of.

"Antique pistol or revolver" means
any pistol or revolver manufactured before 1899 and any replica thereof if it
either is not designed or redesigned for using rimfire or conventional
centerfire fixed ammunition or is designed or redesigned to use rimfire or conventional
centerfire fixed ammunition that is no longer manufactured in the United States
and is not readily available in the ordinary channels of commercial trade.

"Assault pistol" means a
semiautomatic pistol that accepts a detachable magazine and has two or more of
the following characteristics:

(1) An ammunition magazine that attaches to the
pistol outside of the pistol grip;

(2) A threaded barrel capable of accepting a barrel
extender, flash suppressor, forward hand grip, or silencer;

(3) A shroud that is attached to or partially or
completely encircles the barrel and permits the shooter to hold the firearm
with the second hand without being burned;

(4) A manufactured weight of fifty ounces or more
when the pistol is unloaded;

(5) A centerfire pistol with an overall length of
twelve inches or more; or

(6) It is a semiautomatic version of an automatic
firearm;

but does not include a firearm with a barrel sixteen
or more inches in length, an antique pistol as defined in this section, or a
curio or relic as those terms are used in 18 United States Code section
921(a)(13) or 27 Code of Federal Regulations section 478.11.

"Automatic firearm" means any firearm
that shoots, is designed to shoot, or can be readily modified to shoot
automatically more than one shot, without a manual reloading, by a single
function of the trigger. This term shall also include the frame or receiver of
any such firearm, any part designed and intended solely and exclusively, or any
combination of parts designed and intended, for use in converting a firearm
into an automatic firearm, and any combination of parts from which an automatic
firearm can be assembled if the parts are in the possession or under the
control of a single person.

"Chief of police" means the chief of
police of the counties of Hawaii, Maui, Kauai, or the city and county of
Honolulu.

"Crime of violence" means any
offense, as defined in title 37, that involves injury or threat of injury to
the person of another, including sexual assault in the fourth degree under section
707-733 and harassment by stalking under section 711-1106.5.

"Electric gun" means any portable
device that is electrically operated to project a missile or electromotive
force. It does not include any electric livestock prod used in animal husbandry
and any automatic external defibrillator used in emergency medical situations.

"Firearm" means any weapon, for which
the operating force is an explosive, including but not limited to pistols,
revolvers, rifles, shotguns, automatic firearms, noxious gas projectors,
mortars, bombs, and cannon.

"Firearm loaded with ammunition" and
"loaded firearm" means a firearm with ammunition present within the
firing chamber, revolving cylinder, or within a magazine which is inserted in a
firearm.

"Fugitive from justice" means any
person (1) who has fled from any state, territory, the District of Columbia, or
possession of the United States, to avoid prosecution for a felony or to avoid
giving testimony in any criminal proceeding or (2) who has fled from any country
other than the United States and is avoiding lawful extradition back to that
country.

"Pistol" or "revolver"
means any firearm of any shape with a barrel less than sixteen inches in length
and capable of discharging loaded ammunition or any noxious gas.

"Public highway" shall have the same
meaning as defined in section 264-1(a).

"Semiautomatic" means the mode of
operation by which a firearm uses the energy of the explosive in a fixed
cartridge to extract a fired cartridge and chamber a fresh cartridge with each
single pull of a trigger. [L 1988, c 275, pt of §2 and am c 271, §2; am L 1989,
c 263, §§2, 3; am L 1990, c 195, §1; am L 1992, c 286, §1; am L 1994, c 204,
§2; am L 2001, c 252, §2; am L 2016, c 55, §1 and c 109, §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next